Illinois, session 104th, HB5024.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-5-12 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-5-12 new)7    Sec. 11-5-12. Detention center facilities. 8    (a) In this Section:9    "Detention center facility" means any one or more of the 10following:11        (1) a facility that is owned, leased, operated, or 12    otherwise controlled by any unit of government or a 13    federal immigration authority and that has as its primary 14    use the occupation under restraint or security of 15    individuals detained by or in the custody of any unit of 16    government or a federal immigration authority for 17    immigration-related purposes;18        (2) a facility where individuals who have been 19    detained by or are in the custody of any unit of government 20    or a federal immigration authority are processed for 21    deportation from the United States; or22        (3) a facility where individuals who have been 23    detained by or in the custody of any unit of government or   HB5024 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20598 JDS 34089 b1    a federal immigration authority are temporarily held while 2    their citizenship status is determined.3    "Federal immigration authority" means the United States 4Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the United States Customs 5and Border Protection, the United States Department of 6Homeland Security, or any other federal agency exercising 7immigration enforcement authority under the laws of the United 8States or any entity that is under contract with such an agency 9to perform immigration enforcement activities.10    (b) A detention center facility may not be located, 11constructed, or operated within 1,500 feet of the property 12boundaries of any school, day care center, day care home, 13cemetery, public park, forest preserve, public housing, 14private residence, or place of religious worship, regardless 15of address.  16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.